Illinois, session 104th, HB4731.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Underground Utility Facilities 5Damage Prevention Act is amended by changing Section 2 as 6follows: 7    (220 ILCS 50/2)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 1602)8    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 9context clearly otherwise requires, the terms specified in 10this Section have the meanings ascribed to them in this 11Section.12    "Approximate location" means the location of the marked 13facility that lies entirely within the tolerance zone. 14    Circumstances that are "beyond the reasonable control" of 15a party include, but are not limited to, severe weather, 16unforeseen mechanical issues, or site conditions. As used in 17Section 11, "beyond the reasonable control" also includes, but 18is not limited to, notice volumes or dig site notification 19areas that exceed historical averages, as determined by the 20reasonable control measurement, created as a result of 21underground utility facility owners or operators or their 22contractors or subcontractors' non-emergency requests for 23utility excavation work for underground utility facility   HB4731- 2 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1owners or operators, that is not part of a large project that 2has provided at least 60 days' notice, and only applies to the 3requests submitted by underground utility facility owners or 4operators or their contractors or subcontractors' 5non-emergency utility excavation work for underground utility 6facility owners or operators.7    "Damage" means the contact or dislocation of a facility 8during excavation or demolition that necessitates immediate or 9subsequent repair by the underground utility facility owner or 10operator due to any partial or complete destruction of the 11facility, including, but not limited to, the protective 12coating, tracer wire, lateral support, cathodic protection, or 13housing for the line or device of the facility. 14    "Damage notification" means a notification through JULIE 15to the underground utility facility owner or operator that 16damage to a facility has occurred in the area of the excavation 17or demolition. 18    "Day" means any day, beginning at 12:00 a.m. and ending at 1911:59 p.m. "Day" does not include holidays recognized by 20JULIE, Saturdays, Sundays, and the day of the actual notice. 21    "Demolition" means the wrecking, razing, rending, moving, 22or removing of a structure by means of any power tool, power 23equipment (exclusive of transportation equipment), or 24explosives. 25    "Emergency request" means a request involving a condition 26(1) that constitutes an imminent danger to life, health, or   HB4731- 3 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1property or a utility service outage (2) and that requires 2repair or action before the expiration of 2 days. 3    "Excavation" means:4        (1) any operation in which earth, rock, or other 5    material in or on the ground is moved, removed, or 6    otherwise displaced by means of any tools, power equipment 7    or explosives, and includes, without limitation, grading, 8    trenching, digging, ditching, drilling, augering, boring, 9    tunneling, scraping, cable or pipe plowing, saw cutting or 10    roadway surface milling when penetrating into the base or 11    subbase of a paved surface, and driving, but does not 12    include:13            (A) farm tillage operations;14            (B) railroad right-of-way maintenance;15            (C) coal mining operations regulated under the 16        federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 17        1977 or any State law or rules or regulations adopted 18        under the federal statute;19            (D) land surveying operations as defined in the 20        Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989 when 21        not using power equipment;22            (E) roadway surface milling;23            (F) manually inserting, without the use of power 24        equipment, a temporary round-tipped ground or probe 25        rod as part of facility locating;26            (G) manually inserting, without the use of power   HB4731- 4 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1        equipment, a temporary round-tipped probe rod for bar 2        holing to determine the area of a potential leak from a 3        facility transporting hazardous gases or liquids; or4            (H) manually inserting, without the use of power 5        equipment, a round-tipped ground rod for the purpose 6        of grounding utility equipment when an emergency 7        exists and no other ground source is available; or .8            (I) an excavation for the purpose of connecting a 9        communications service customer's home or business to 10        the communications service provider's own 11        communications network that is performed: (i) only 12        with a hand tool, (ii) by a communications service 13        provider, and (iii) to a depth not greater than 12 14        inches.15        (2) An exclusion to this Section in no way prohibits a 16    request from being made for the marking of facilities.17        (3) Any exception to excavation contained within this 18    Section is not intended to remove liability that may be 19    imposed against an individual or entity because of damage 20    caused to a facility. 21    "Excavator" means any person or legal entity, public or 22private, that engages in excavation or demolition work.23    "Exposed notification" means a notification through JULIE 24to the underground utility facility owner or operator that an 25unmarked facility has been exposed in the area of the 26excavation or demolition but has not been damaged.  HB4731- 5 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1    "Extension" means a request made by an excavator, to 2extend the expiration date of a normal notice to allow 3additional time to continue or complete the excavation or 4demolition project.5        (1) An extension request may be made no earlier than 6    the 20th day from the initial normal notice request or 7    latest extension request.8        (2) An extension request shall extend the expiration 9    of the initial normal notice request or latest extension 10    request by 25 days.11        (3) An extension request may not be made simply to 12    keep a prior notice open without continued excavation 13    occurring within the period of that subsequent notice.14    "Geographic information system data" means data to be 15applied to JULIE software to facilitate a more clearly defined 16notification area for notices sent to the system underground 17utility facility owners or operators. "Geographic information 18system data" includes, but is not limited to:19        (1) address points with site addresses;20        (2) parcels with site addresses;21        (3) road center lines with names and address range;22        (4) city limits with names;23        (5) political townships with names;24        (6) railroads with names;25        (7) streams with names; and26        (8) water bodies with names.  HB4731- 6 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1    "Historical averages" are used to determine benchmark 2notice volumes or dig site notification areas for a particular 3place. The notice volume is calculated for new and updated 4requests requiring an underground utility facility owner or 5operator response. It shall not include notices with a header 6of no show, incomplete, or no re-mark. The dig site 7notification area is calculated using the dig site polygon on 8the notice. The 7-day look back shall be calculated once daily 9at the conclusion of the previous calendar day. "Historic 10averages" shall be determined by comparing notice volumes or 11dig site notification areas over the immediate past 7 calendar 12days to the same 7 calendar day period for the past 5 years. A 135-year trimmed mean, removing the highest and lowest years, 14and averaging the remaining 3 years, shall be the final 15determinant of this measurement. The official measurement of 16the notice volumes or dig site notification areas shall be 17provided by JULIE. 18    "Incomplete request" means a notice initiated by an 19excavator through JULIE to the underground utility facility 20owners or operators notified in a prior request that such 21underground utility facility owners or operators, as 22identified by the excavator and confirmed, through the 23positive response system once implemented, in accordance with 24subsection (a) of Section 5.1, did not completely mark the 25entire extent or the entire segment of the proposed 26excavation, as identified on the prior notice or as previously   HB4731- 7 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1documented and mutually agreed upon.2    "Joint meet notification" means a notice of a meeting held 3prior to the excavation phase to discuss projects that cannot 4be adequately communicated within a normal notice request. The 5meeting is intended to allow the exchange of maps, plans, or 6schedules. It is not a locating session and shall be held at or 7near the excavation site, or through electronic means, if 8available and agreed to by all parties. "Joint meet 9notification" are not to be used in lieu of valid normal notice 10requests and are required for, but not limited to, large 11projects.12    "JULIE, Inc." or "JULIE" means the communication system 13known as "JULIE, Inc." or "JULIE", utilized by excavators, 14designers, or any other entities covered by this Act to notify 15underground utility facility owners or operators of their 16intent to perform excavation or demolition or similar work as 17defined by this Act and shall include all underground utility 18facilities owned or operated outside the city limits of the 19City of Chicago.20    "Large project" means a single excavation that exceeds the 21expiration date of a normal notice request, or involves a 22series of repetitive, related-scope excavations.23    "Normal notice request" means a notification made by an 24excavator, through JULIE, in advance of a planned excavation 25or demolition.26        (1) The notification shall be made at least 2 days,   HB4731- 8 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1    but no more than 10 days, before beginning the planned 2    excavation or demolition.3        (2) Excavation or demolition on a normal notice 4    request is valid for 25 days from the date of the initial 5    request unless a subsequent extension request is made.6        (3) Normal notice requests shall be limited to one 7    quarter of a contiguous mile within a municipality and one 8    contiguous mile within any unincorporated area, which 9    includes townships.10        (4) Normal notice requests are valid for a single 11    right-of-way with an exception for intersecting 12    rights-of-way of 250 feet in all directions. Any 13    excavation continuing beyond 250 feet on a connecting 14    right-of-way shall require an additional request.15    "No show request" means a notice initiated by an excavator 16through JULIE to the underground utility facility owners or 17operators notified in the prior notice that such underground 18utility facility owners or operators, as identified by the 19excavator and confirmed, once implemented, in accordance with 20subsection (a) of Section 5.1, either failed to mark their 21facilities or to communicate their non-involvement with the 22excavation prior to the dig start date and time on the notice.23    "Notice" means any record transmitted to an underground 24utility facility owner or operator of JULIE which shall 25include, but not be limited to, cancel, damage, emergency, 26exposed, extension, incomplete, joint meet, no show, normal,   HB4731- 9 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1planning design, or re-mark.2    "Open cut utility locate" means a method of locating 3facilities that requires excavation by the underground utility 4facility owner or operator, or their contractor or 5subcontractor.6    "Place" means any incorporated city, village or town, or 7unincorporated township or road district, listed within the 8JULIE database.9    "Planning design request" means the process prior to the 10excavation phase of a project where information is gathered 11and decisions are made regarding the route or location of a 12proposed excavation. The use of the information that is 13obtainable pursuant to this Section is intended to minimize 14delays of future construction projects and not for imminent 15excavation. The underground utility facility owner or operator 16may indicate any portion of the information that is 17proprietary and require the planner or designer to protect the 18proprietary information.19    "Positive response system" means an automated system 20facilitated by JULIE allowing underground utility facility 21owners or operators to communicate to an excavator the 22presence, absence, or response status of any conflict between 23the existing facilities in or near the area of excavation or 24demolition on each notice received.25    "Pre-mark" means the use of white paint, chalk, lathe, 26whiskers, flags, or electronic white lining using lines or   HB4731- 10 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1polygons to delineate the work area at the site of the proposed 2excavation or demolition. Unless otherwise stated on the 3request, all pre-marks are considered a request for a 5-foot 4radius of an above ground fixed structure or single point 5pre-mark, or a 10-foot-wide path for linear work.6        (1) Physical pre-marking for the area of the planned 7    excavation or demolition shall be accomplished prior to 8    notifying JULIE if the area of excavation cannot be 9    clearly and adequately identified in the normal notice 10    request.11        (2) Electronic white lining may be used when 12    available. Electronic white lining provides an alternative 13    method where an excavator may indicate their defined dig 14    area visually by electronic data entry, including lines or 15    polygons, without the need for a physical site visit. The 16    technology allows the excavator to identify for the 17    underground utility facility owner or operator a clear 18    delineation of their proposed excavation area.19        (3) A verbal or written pre-mark is adequate when the 20    scope requested to be marked is narrow and explicit enough 21    to prevent marking beyond the actual area of excavation or 22    demolition. An existing above ground fixed structure may 23    be referenced as a verbal or written pre-mark.24    "Project owner" means the person or legal entity, public 25or private, that is financially responsible for the 26undertaking of a project that involves excavation or   HB4731- 11 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1demolition.2    "Reasonable control measurement" shall use the historical 3averages and add to the calculation either of the following 4conditions that shall be met for the place to be considered 5beyond the reasonable control of the underground utility 6facility owner or operator:7        (1) the total notice volume count over the previous 7 8    calendar days shall increase by more than 15% of the 9    historic average, and increase by not less than 25 10    additional notices over the previous 7 calendar days; or11        (2) the total dig site notification area over the 12    previous 7 calendar days shall increase by more than 15% 13    of the historic average, and not less than 0.4 additional 14    square miles over the previous 7 calendar days.15    The official measurement shall be provided by JULIE.16    "Residential property owner" means any individual or 17entity that owns or leases real property that is used by the 18individual or entity as its residence or dwelling. Residential 19property owner does not include any persons who own or lease 20residential property for the purpose of holding or developing 21such property or for any other business or commercial 22purposes.23    "Roadway surface milling" means the removal of a uniform 24pavement section by rotomilling, grinding, saw cutting, or 25other means that does not penetrate into the roadway base or 26subbase.  HB4731- 12 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1    "Service lateral" means underground facilities located in 2a public right-of-way or utility easement that connects an end 3user's building or property to an underground utility facility 4owner's or operator's facility.5    "Submerged" means any facility installed below the surface 6of a lake, river, or navigable waterway.7    "Tolerance zone" means:8        (1) if the diameter of the underground utility 9    facility is indicated, the distance of one-half of the 10    known diameter plus one and one-half feet on either side 11    of the designated center line of the underground utility 12    facility marking;13        (2) if the diameter of the underground utility 14    facility is not indicated, one and one-half feet on either 15    side of the outside edge of the underground utility 16    facility marking; or17        (3) if submerged, a distance of 30 feet on either side 18    of the indicated facility.19        The underground utility facility markings provided 20    shall not indicate that the width of the marked 21    underground utility facility is any greater than the 22    actual width of the underground utility facility or 2 23    inches, whichever is greater. The tolerance zone shall 24    also apply to visible utility structures, including, but 25    not limited to, poles with overhead to underground 26    transitions, pedestals, transformers, meters, hydrants,   HB4731- 13 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1    and valve boxes. There shall be a one and one-half foot 2    tolerance zone horizontally around such facilities.3    "Underground utility facility" or "facility" means and 4includes wires, ducts, fiber optic cable, conduits, pipes, 5sewers, and cables and their connected appurtenances installed 6or existing beneath the surface of the ground or submerged and 7either owned, operated, or controlled by:8        (1) a public utility as defined in the Public 9    Utilities Act;10        (2) a municipally owned or mutually owned utility 11    providing a similar utility service;12        (3) a pipeline entity transporting gases, crude oil, 13    petroleum products, or other hydrocarbon materials within 14    the State;15        (4) a telecommunications carrier as defined in the 16    Universal Telephone Service Protection Law of 1985, or by 17    a company described in Section 1 of the Telephone Company 18    Act;19        (5) a community antenna television system, as defined 20    in the Illinois Municipal Code or the Counties Code;21        (6) a holder or broadband service, as those terms are 22    defined in the Cable and Video Competition Law of 2007;23        (7) any other entity owning or operating underground 24    facilities that transport or generate electrical power to 25    other utility owners or operators;26        (8) an electric cooperative as defined in the Public   HB4731- 14 -LRB104 18437 AAS 31879 b1    Utilities Act; and2        (9) any other active member of JULIE. 3(Source: P.A. 103-614, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.